Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 4. State Recreation Areas.

Sec. 41.21.410.
Purpose of AS 41.21.410 — 41.21.426.

The purpose of AS

41.21.410

—

41.21.426

is to empower the governor to restrict state owned land and water described in AS

41.21.415

, except as provided in AS

41.21.426

, to use as a public recreation area. Under AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature. Because the area described in AS

41.21.415

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.410

— 41.21.426 are intended to provide for the closing of the land and water described in AS 41.21.415, as that description is modified by AS 41.21.426, to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and its subsequent designation as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, sec. 7, of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1969; am § 3 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.070. Renumbered as AS 41.20.130 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 9, 2015, twice substituted “AS

41.21.410

-

41.21.426

” for “AS

41.21.410

-

41.21.425

”; in the first sentence, inserted “, except as provided in AS

41.21.426

,” preceding “to use as a public recreation area”; in the second sentence, substituted “the land and water described in AS

41.21.415

, as that description is modified by AS 41.21.426,” for “the described land and water”; and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 41.21.415.
Authority to designate Captain Cook State Recreation Area.

The governor may designate by proclamation the state-owned land and water and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the parcels described in this section, as the Captain Cook State Recreation Area.
The proclamation may include the entire area or portions of the area at different times, shall reserve the areas included from all uses incompatible with their primary function as public recreation land and water, and shall assign them to the department for control, development and maintenance.
Land covered by AS

41.21.410

—

41.21.425

is that within the following described parcels:

Township 8 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Section 3

Section 9

Section 10: NW1/4, NE1/4, SW1/4, W1/2 SE1/4

Section 15: W1/2 W1/2

Sections 16 and 17

All tideland abutting the above and all of Stormy Lake.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.080. Renumbered as AS 41.20.140 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983. In 1969, “SW1/4” was added to the description of land in Section 10 to correct a manifest clerical error in ch. 100, SLA 1969.

Administrative Code. —

For Captain Cook state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 11.

Sec. 41.21.420.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Captain Cook State Recreation Area in accordance with AS

41.21.410

, and those incompatible uses designated shall be prohibited or restricted, as provided by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.090. Renumbered as AS 41.20.150 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.425.
Negotiated purchase authorized.

The commissioner may acquire, by negotiated purchase only in the name of the state, title to or interest in real property lying within the boundaries of the Captain Cook State Recreation Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.100. Renumbered as AS 41.20.160 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.426.
Certain land excepted.

Notwithstanding AS

41.21.020(a)(6)

,

41.21.410

—

41.21.425

, or a regulation issued implementing AS

41.21.420

, state-owned land in the following described parcels may be leased in accordance with AS 38.35 (Right-of-Way Leasing Act) for the purpose of construction and operation of a natural gas pipeline from the North Slope:

A state or federal survey does not remove land from the parcels described in (a) of this section.

The department shall manage any state-owned land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Captain Cook State Recreation Area as part of Captain Cook State Recreation Area until the land is leased under AS 38.35. State-owned land described in this section will revert to Captain Cook State Recreation Area upon release of the land from a right-of-way through termination of the lease or otherwise and upon satisfaction of the lessee’s obligations to restore and revegetate the land.

Any right-of-way lease issued under AS 38.35 across land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Captain Cook State Recreation Area must

reserve to the state the interests necessary to provide for public access by foot, snow machine, dog sled, and other traditional means of access along and across the leased corridor;

preserve, to the maximum extent practicable, the recreational, scenic, cultural, historical, and habitat values consistent with the leasehold’s location within the exterior boundaries of Captain Cook State Recreation Area; and

provide for termination of the lease if construction of the pipeline has not begun 10 years after the effective date of the lease.

AS

38.35.130

does not apply to land within the exterior boundaries of Captain Cook State Recreation Area.

A natural gas pipeline right-of-way lease may not be issued across land described in this section unless the lease becomes effective before January 1, 2025.

Township 8 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Section 3: SE1/4

Section 9: SE1/4

Section 10: N1/2, SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4

Section 15: W1/2W1/2

Section 16

Section 17: S1/2, S1/2NE1/4.

History.

(§ 4 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 12, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 9, 2015.

Sec. 41.21.430.
Purpose of AS 41.21.430 — 41.21.445.

The purpose of AS

41.21.430

—

41.21.445

is to empower the governor to restrict state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.435

to use as a public recreation area.
Under AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature. Because the area described in AS

41.21.435

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.430

—

41.21.445

are intended to provide for the closing of the described land and water to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and its subsequent designation as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, § 7, of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1971)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.330. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.435.
Authority to designate Caines Head State Recreation Area.

The governor may designate by proclamation the state-owned land and water and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the parcels described in this section, as the Caines Head State Recreation Area.
The proclamation may include the entire area or portions of the area at different times, shall reserve the areas included from all uses incompatible with their primary function as public recreation land and water, and shall assign them to the department for control, development and maintenance.
Land covered by (1) — (4) of this section has a total acreage of 1801.11 acres, including approximately 221.11 acres of federal land.
Land covered by (5) of this section has a total acreage of approximately 4,160 acres.
Land covered by AS

41.21.430

—

41.21.445

is that within the following described parcels:

U.S.S. 2742: portions of Sections 22 and 27 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian;

U.S.S. 2744: in Section 14 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian;

U.S.S. 4830: portions of Sections 14, 23 and 24 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian (E.O. 3406 Lighthouse Reserve);

Section 10 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian E1/2; Section 11 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian SW1/4; Section 14 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian NW1/4, SW1/4, SE1/4 and portions of NE1/4 above mean low tide; Section 15 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian E1/2; Section 22 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian E1/2; Section 23 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian NW1/4, NE1/4 and portions of SW1/4 above mean low tide and portions of SE1/4 above mean low tide; Section 24 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian W1/2 portion above mean low tide; Section 27 T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian N1/2, NE1/4 above mean low tide;

Section 9, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian; Section 10, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian, West 1/2; Section 15, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian, West 1/2; Section 16, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian; Section 21, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian; Section 22, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian, West 1/2; Section 27, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian; Section 28, T2S, R1W, Seward Meridian.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.335. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Caines Head state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 7.

Sec. 41.21.440.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Caines Head State Recreation Area in accordance with AS

41.21.435

, and those incompatible uses designated are prohibited or restricted, as provided by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1971)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.340. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.445.
Purchase authorized; eminent domain prohibited.

The commissioner may acquire, by purchase in the name of the state, title to or interest in real property lying within the boundaries of the Caines Head State Recreation Area.
The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land for inclusion in the Caines Head State Recreation Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1971)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.345. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.450.
Purpose of AS 41.21.450 — 41.21.466.

The purpose of AS

41.21.450

—

41.21.466

is to restrict state-owned land and water within the boundaries described in AS

41.21.455

, except as provided in AS

41.21.466

, to use as a public recreation area. Under the provisions of AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature. Inasmuch as the area described in AS

41.21.455

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.450

— 41.21.466 are intended to except the area described in AS 41.21.455, as that description is modified by AS 41.21.466, from the provisions of AS

38.05.300

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 61 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.491. Renumbered in 1983.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 9, 2015, twice substituted “AS

41.21.450

-

41.21.466

” for “AS

41.21.450

-

41.21.465

”; in the first sentence, inserted “, except as provided in AS

41.21.466

,” preceding “to use as a public recreation area”; in the second sentence inserted “in AS

41.21.455

, as that description is modified by AS 41.21.466,” preceding “From the provisions of AS

38.05.300

”.

Sec. 41.21.455.
Nancy Lake State Recreation Area established.

The presently state-owned land and water and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the following described boundary, are hereby designated as the Nancy Lake State Recreation Area, are reserved from all uses incompatible with their primary function as public recreation land, and are assigned to the department for control, development, and maintenance:

Nothing in this section affects the right of an organized borough to extract gravel from land that is located within the recreation area and that has been selected by the borough before April 22, 1970 under former AS 07.10.150 — 07.10.160.

Beginning at the brass capped monument marking the one quarter corner position, common to Section 34 and Section 35, Township 19 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian, Alaska, which is the true point of beginning; thence easterly along the 1/4 line of Section 35 to the west shore of an unnamed lake; thence meandering said lake clockwise in a northerly and southerly direction to a point where said meanders intersect the east-west 1/4 line of Section 35; thence easterly along the 1/4 line of Section 35 to the west shore of an unnamed lake; thence meandering said lake clockwise in a northerly and easterly direction to a point where said meanders intersect the east-west 1/4 line of Section 35; thence easterly along the 1/4 line of Section 35 to the 1/4 corner position common to Section 35 and Section 36; thence southerly along the section line common to Sections 35 and 36 to the common corner between Sections 35 and 36, Township 19 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian and Sections 1 and 2, Township 18 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian; thence easterly along the common line between said Sections 1 and 36 to the common corner of Section 1, Township 18 North, Range 5 West and Section 36, Township 19 North, Range 5 West and Section 31, Township 19 North, Range 4 West and Section 6, Township 18 North, Range 4 West; thence easterly along the common line between said Sections 31 and 6 to the 1/4 corner position common to Sections 31 and 6; thence northerly along the 1/4 line of Section 31 to the C 1/4 corner positions; thence easterly along the 1/4 line of Section 31 and Section 32 to the C 1/4 corner position of Section 32, Township 19 North, Range 4 West; thence northerly along the 1/4 line of Section 32 and Section 29 to the C-N-S 1/64th corner position of Section 29, Township 19 North, Range 4 West; thence easterly along the N-S 1/64th line of said Section 29 to the N-S 1/64th corner position common to Section 29 and Section 28; thence southerly along the east section line of Section 29 and Section 32 to the S-N-N 1/256th corner position of said Section 32; thence westerly along the S-N-N 1/256th line to the SE-NE-NE 1/256th corner positions; thence southerly along the E-E-E 1/256th line to the NE-SE-NE 1/256th corner position; thence easterly along the N-S-N 1/256th line to the N-S-N 1/256th corner position; thence southerly along the east boundary of Section 32 to the S-N 1/64th corner position of said Section 32; thence westerly along the S-N 1/64th line to the C-E-SE-NE 1/256th corner position; thence southerly along the E-E-E 1/256th line to the north shore of Nancy Lake; thence meandering said lake clockwise in an easterly, northerly, and southerly direction to a point where said meander line intersects the north line of Section Lot 41, Section 33, Township 19 North, Range 4 West; thence easterly along said north line to the NE corner of said Lot 41; thence southerly along the east line of said Lot 41 to the north shore of Nancy Lake; thence meandering said lake in an easterly, northerly, southerly, and westerly direction to a point where said meander line intersects the east line of Section Lot 54, Section 33, Township 19 North, Range 4 West; thence southerly along said east line of said Lot 54 to the east shore of Nancy Lake; thence meandering said lake in an easterly, northerly, southerly, and westerly direction to a point where said meander line intersects the N-N-N 1/256th line of Section 4, Township 18 North, Range 4 West; thence westerly along said N-N-N 1/256th line to the NE-NW-NW 1/256th corner position; thence southerly along the E-W-W 1/256th line to the SE-NW-NW 1/256th corner position; thence easterly along the S-N-N 1/256th line to the C-S-N-NW 1/256th corner position; thence along the W 1/16th line to the C-W 1/16th corner position; thence westerly along the 1/4 line to the 1/4 corner position common to Section 4 and Section 5; thence southerly along the east section line of Sections 5, 8, 17, 20, 29, 32, and 5, to the section corner common to Sections 4, 5, 8, and 9, Township 17 North, Range 4 West; thence westerly along the section line common to Section 5 and Section 8 to the E 1/16th corner position; thence southerly along the E 1/16th line to the SE 1/16th corner position of said Section 8; thence westerly along the S 1/16th line to the C-S 1/16th corner position of Section 7, Township 17 North, Range 4 West; thence northerly along the 1/4 line to the C 1/4 corner position of Section 6, Township 17 North, Range 4 West; thence westerly along the 1/4 line of said Section 6 to the east shore of Butterfly Lake; thence meandering said lake clockwise in a southerly, northerly, and westerly direction to a point on the west shore of Butterfly Lake where said meander line intersects the north section line of Section 1, Township 17 North, Range 5 West; thence westerly along the north section line of Section 1 and Section 2 to the point of intersection with line 9-10 of U.S. Survey No. 4638; thence south to Corner No. 4, Lot 3 of said U.S. Survey No. 4638; thence west along the north line of said Lot 3 to the point of intersection with the north-south section line common to Section 2 and Section 3; thence northerly along the west section line of Sections 2, 35, and 26, to the point of intersection with line 3-4 of U.S. Survey No. 3869, Township 18 North, Range 5 West; thence west along said line 3-4 of U.S. Survey No. 3869 to the point of intersection with the E 1/16th line of Section 27; thence northerly along said E 1/16th line to the point of intersection with line 1-2 of U.S. Survey No. 3869; thence west along said line 1-2 to Corner No. 1 of said U.S. Survey No. 3869; thence N 20° to 06´ E along line 2-3 of Lot 31, U.S. Survey No. 3868 for a distance of 268.62 ft. to Corner No. 2 of said Lot 31; thence N 69° 54´ W along line 1-2 of said Lot 31, to the east shore of Red Shirt Lake; thence meandering said lake clockwise in a southerly, westerly, easterly, and northerly direction to a point where said meander line intersects line 3-4 of Lot 3, U.S. Survey No. 3868; thence west along said line 3-4 to Corner No. 3 of Lot 3, U.S. Survey No. 3868; thence south along line 2-3 of said Lot 3 to the point of intersection with the east-west section line common to Section 21 and Section 28, Township 18 North, Range 5 West; thence westerly along said section line to the section corner position common to Sections 20, 21, 28, and 29, Township 18 North, Range 5 West; thence northerly along the section line common to Section 20 and Section 21 to the section corner position common to Sections 16, 17, 20, and 21; thence easterly along the section line common to Section 16 and Section 21 to the 1/4 corner position common to said Sections 16 and 21; thence northerly along the 1/4 line of Section 16 to the C 1/4 corner position of said Section 16; thence easterly along the 1/4 line of Section 16 to the 1/4 corner position common to Section 15 and Section 16; thence northerly along the section line common to Section 15 and Section 16 to the section corner position common to Sections 9, 10, 15, and 16; thence easterly along the section line common to Section 10 and Section 15 to the 1/4 corner position common to said Sections 10 and 15; thence northerly along the 1/4 line of Section 10 to the 1/4 corner position common to Section 3 and Section 10; thence easterly along the section line common to Sections 3 and 10 to the section corner position common to Sections 2, 3, 10, and 11; thence northerly along the section line common to Section 2 and Section 3, Township 18 North, Range 5 West, and Section 34 and Section 35, Township 19 North, Range 5 West to the brass capped monument marking the 1/4 corner position common to said Sections 34 and 35 which is the true point of beginning.

History.

(§ 2 ch 61 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.492. Renumbered in 1983. In 1993, in the legal description in (a) of this section, three references to the south shore of Nancy Lake were changed to two references to the north shore and one to the east shore to correct manifest errors in § 1, ch. 75, SLA 1970.

Administrative Code. —

For Nancy Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 10.

Sec. 41.21.460.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Nancy Lake State Recreation Area in accordance with the requirements of AS

41.21.450

, and those incompatible uses designated shall be prohibited or restricted, as provided by regulation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.495. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Nancy Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 10.

Sec. 41.21.465.
Purchase authorized.

The commissioner may acquire, by purchase in the name of the state, title to or interest in real property lying within the boundaries of the Nancy Lake State Recreation Area.

History.

(§ 4 ch 61 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.496. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.466.
Certain land excepted.

Notwithstanding AS

41.21.020(a)(6)

or

41.21.450

—

41.21.465

, state-owned land in the following described parcels may be leased in accordance with AS 38.35 (Right-of-Way Leasing Act) for the purpose of construction and operation of a natural gas pipeline from the North Slope:

Township 18 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

A state or federal survey does not remove land from the parcels described in (a) of this section.

The department shall manage any state-owned land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Nancy Lake State Recreation Area as part of Nancy Lake State Recreation Area until the land is leased under AS 38.35. State-owned land described in this section will revert to Nancy Lake State Recreation Area upon release of the land from a right-of-way through termination of the lease or otherwise and upon satisfaction of the lessee’s obligations to restore and revegetate the land.

Any right-of-way lease issued under AS 38.35 across land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Nancy Lake State Recreation Area must

reserve to the state the interests necessary to provide for public access by foot, snow machine, dog sled, and other traditional means of access along and across the leased corridor;

preserve, to the maximum extent practicable, the recreational, scenic, cultural, historical, and habitat values consistent with the leasehold’s location within the exterior boundaries of Nancy Lake State Recreation Area; and

provide for termination of the lease if construction of the pipeline has not begun 10 years after the effective date of the lease.

AS

38.35.130

does not apply to land within the exterior boundaries of Nancy Lake State Recreation Area.

A natural gas pipeline right-of-way lease may not be issued across land described in this section unless the lease becomes effective before January 1, 2025.

Section 10: E1/2

Section 11: NW1/4

Section 15: NW1/4

Section 16: SE1/4

Section 21: W1/2;

Section 35: SW1/4.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 6, ch. 12, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 9, 2015.

Sec. 41.21.470.
Purpose of AS 41.21.470 — 41.21.490.

The purpose of AS

41.21.470

—

41.21.490

is to restrict all vacant and unappropriated state-owned land, water, and stream crossings within the boundaries described in AS

41.21.475

to use as a public recreation area.
Under the provisions of AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature. Inasmuch as the area described in AS

41.21.475

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.470

—

41.21.490

are intended to except the area described from the provisions of AS

38.05.300

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.497. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.475.
Chena River State Recreation Area established.

The presently state-owned land and water, vacant and unappropriated, and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the following described boundary, are hereby designated as the Chena River State Recreation Area, are reserved from all uses incompatible with their primary function as public recreation land, and are assigned to the department for control, development and maintenance:

Protracted Sections and Townships. — Township 1 North, Range 6 East, Fairbanks Meridian, Section 24; Township 1 North, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian, Sections 1, 2, 3, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 15, 16, 17, 19, 20 and 21; Township 2 North, Range 7 East, Fairbanks Meridian, Sections 12, 13, 24, 25, 35, and 36; Township 2 North, Range 8 East, Fairbanks Meridian, Sections 6, 7, and 18;

Beginning at the N.W. corner of the area designated in (1) of this section, said point being the N.W. corner of Section 6, T2N, R8E, Fairbanks Meridian; thence north along the section line to the N.E. corner of Section 25, T3N, R7E; thence west along the section line to the S.W. corner of the S.E. 1/4 of Section 20, T3N, R7E; thence north along the 1/4 section line to the N.E. corner of the N.W. 1/4, Section 17, T3N, R7E; thence west along the section line to the N.W. corner of Section 16, T3N, R6E; thence south along the section line to the N.W. corner of Section 16, T2N, R6E; thence west along the section line to the N.W. corner of Section 14, T2N, R5E; thence south along the section line to the N.W. corner of Section 23, T1N, R5E; thence west along the section line to the N.W. corner of Section 20, T1N, R5E; thence south along the section line to the S.W. corner of Section 32, T1N, R5E; thence east to the N.W. corner of Section 2, T1S, R5E; thence south along the section line to the S.W. corner of Section 11, T1S, R5E; thence east along the section line to the S.W. corner of Section 10, T1S, R6E; thence south along the section line to the S.W. corner of Section 10, T2S, R6E; thence east along the section line to the S.W. corner of Section 7, T2S, R9E; thence north along the section line to the N.W. corner of Section 6, T1S, R9E; thence east to the S.E. corner of Section 36, T1N, R8E; thence north along the section line to the N.E. corner of Section 12, T2N, R8E; thence west along the section line to the N.E. corner of Section 7, T2N, R8E; thence north along the section line to the N.E. corner of Section 6, T2N, R8E; thence west along the section line to the point of beginning, containing approximately 254,080 acres.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.498(a). Renumbered in 1983. In 1988, in AS

41.21.475

—

41.21.490

, the word “State” was added to the name of the recreation area to conform to the style of this chapter and AS

41.21.020(a)(13)

.

Administrative Code. —

For Chena River state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 8.

Sec. 41.21.480.
Eminent domain authorized to acquire necessary access.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within the Chena River State Recreation Area unless it is for the purpose of providing necessary access to state land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.498(b). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

Sec. 41.21.485.
Zoning of private land.

The department may adopt, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), zoning regulations governing privately owned land in the Chena River State Recreation Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.498(c). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.490.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Chena River State Recreation Area in accordance with the requirements of AS

41.21.020(a)(13)

and

41.21.470

, and those incompatible uses designated shall be prohibited or restricted, as provided by regulation.
The regulations may not prohibit

work on valid mineral leases or mining claims;

the legal taking of fur-bearing animals;

the traditional use of roads and trails by any means of transportation, including a vehicle propelled by machinery, if the use occurred regularly in the area of the state recreation area before June 18, 1967;

the cutting of dead and down or burnt timber.

History.

(§ 3 ch 26 SLA 1967; am §§ 2, 3 ch 78 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.505. Renumbered in 1983. The second sentence of this section was originally enacted as part of AS 41.20.020(a)(13) and was transferred in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For Chena River state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 8.

Sec. 41.21.491.
Willow Creek State Recreation Area.

The surface estate in the land and water owned by the state as of June 9, 1987 and all land and water acquired by the state in the future, including shore and submerged land, lying within the parcels described in this subsection is designated as the Willow Creek State Recreation Area:

Township 19 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

The department may agree to manage land owned by the Matanuska-Susitna Borough that is within the parcels described in (a) of this section and that is designated by ordinance or resolution of the borough as a part of the Willow Creek State Recreation Area.

Subject to valid existing rights, the land and water described in (a) of this section is designated as a special purpose area under art. VIII, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

Except for oil and gas leasing under AS

38.05.180

, the mineral estate in the state-owned land and water described in (a) of this section is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.181

—

38.05.275

.

Section 5: Lot 3, Lot 4, S1/2NE1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2NW1/4

Section 6: Lot 3, Lot 4, Lot 5, SE1/4NW1/4;

Section 1: SE1/4, W1/2, Tract A, Tract B, Tract C

Section 2

Section 3: N1/2;

Section 34

Section 35

Section 36: S1/2.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1987)

Sec. 41.21.492.
Designation of management responsibilities.

The land and water described in AS

41.21.491

(a), including land and water owned by the Matanuska-Susitna Borough and designated by the borough in a management agreement under AS

41.21.491

(b), is assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development, consistent with the purposes of AS 41.21.491 —

41.21.495

.

Nothing in AS

41.21.491

—

41.21.495

affects the responsibilities of

the Department of Fish and Game, the Board of Fisheries, or the Board of Game under AS 16 and AS

41.99.010

; or

the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS 46.03.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 106 § 4 (2003); am § 8 ch 31 SLA 2005)

Sec. 41.21.493.
Comprehensive management plan.

The commissioner shall develop and adopt a comprehensive management plan for the Willow Creek State Recreation Area with the concurrence of the Matanuska-Susitna Borough.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1987)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 44, SLA 1987 provides, in part: “Until a boat launch is constructed in the recreation area, the commissioner may not restrict boating activities within the Willow Creek State Recreation Area except to protect public safety.”

Sec. 41.21.494.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that are necessary to achieve the purposes of AS

41.21.491

—

41.21.495

and to implement the plan adopted under AS

41.21.493

. The regulations must

designate incompatible uses and prohibit or restrict them;

allow road, railroad, and utility crossing of Willow Creek so as to minimize disturbance to the river’s habitat and scenic and recreation values;

allow fishery rehabilitation or enhancement practices under terms that are compatible with AS

41.21.491

—

41.21.495

;

allow the legal taking of fur-bearing animals; and

allow for hunting, except where it must be prohibited for reasons of public safety.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For Willow Creek state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 4.

Sec. 41.21.495.
Cooperative management agreements.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative management agreements with a federal agency, a municipality, another state agency, or a private landowner to achieve the purposes of AS

41.21.491

—

41.21.495

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1987)

Sec. 41.21.496.
Certain lands excepted.

Notwithstanding AS

41.21.020(a)(6)

or

41.21.491

—

41.21.495

, state-owned land in the following described parcels may be leased in accordance with AS 38.35 (Right-of-Way Leasing Act) for the purpose of construction and operation of a natural gas pipeline from the North Slope: the East 1/2 of Section 2, Township 19 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian and the East 1/2 of Section 35, Township 20 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian.

A state or federal survey does not remove land from the parcels described in (a) of this section.

The department shall manage any state-owned land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Willow Creek State Recreation Area as part of Willow Creek State Recreation Area until the land is leased under AS 38.35. State-owned land described in this section will revert to Willow Creek State Recreation Area upon release of the land from a right-of-way through termination of the lease or otherwise and upon satisfaction of the lessee’s obligations to restore and revegetate the land.

Any right-of-way lease issued under AS 38.35 across land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Willow Creek State Recreation Area must

reserve to the state the interests necessary to provide for public access by foot, snow machine, dog sled, and other traditional means of access along and across the leased corridor;

preserve, to the maximum extent practicable, the recreational, scenic, cultural, historical, and habitat values consistent with the leasehold’s location within the exterior boundaries of Willow Creek State Recreation Area; and

provide for termination of the lease if construction of the pipeline has not begun 10 years after the effective date of the lease.

AS

38.35.130

does not apply to land within the exterior boundaries of Willow Creek State Recreation Area.

A natural gas pipeline right-of-way lease may not be issued across land described in this section unless the lease becomes effective before January 1, 2025.

History.

(§ 7 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 12, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 9, 2015.